Maryland, session 2026, HB0792.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
7–106.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MAIL OR PACKAGE” MEANS AN ITEM DELIVERED OR
LEFT TO BE COLLECTED BY THE UNITED STATES POSTAL SERVICE OR A DELIVERY
SERVICE COMPANY THAT DELIVERS TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0792*

HOUSE BILL 792
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY OR WILLFULLY AND WITHOUT
PERMISSION OF THE INTENDED RECIPIENT OF THE MAIL OR PACKAGE OBTAIN OR
EXERT CONTROL OVER MAIL OR A PACKAGE DELIVERED TO ANOTHER WITH THE
INTENT TO DEPRIVE THE OWNER OF THE MAIL OR PACKAGE.
(C) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS.
(2) AS A CONDITION OF SENTENCING, THE COURT SHALL ORDER THE
DEFENDANT TO:
(I) RESTORE THE MAIL OR PACKAGE TAKEN TO THE PERSON TO
WHOM THE MAIL OR PACKAGE WAS ADDRESSED; OR
(II) PAY RESTITUTION FOR THE VALUE OF THE MAIL OR
PACKAGE UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 6 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–616.
(a) The Division or the Department of Juvenile Services:
(1) in addition to other actions authorized under Part I of this subtitle, may
refer an overdue restitution account for collection to the Central Collection Unit; and
(2) if probation or other supervision is terminated and restitution is still
owed, shall refer the overdue restitution account for collection to the Central Collection
Unit.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the Central Collection Unit may:
(1) collect overdue restitution in accordance with Title 3, Subtitle 3 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article; and
(2) certify a restitution obligor who is in arrears on restitution payments
exceeding $30 under the judgment of restitution to:
(i) the Comptroller for income tax refund interception in accordance
with Title 13, Subtitle 9, Part III of the Tax – General Article; and
(ii) the State Lottery and Gaming Control Agency for State lottery
prize and video lottery facility prize payout interception in accordance with § 11–618 of this
subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 792 3
(c) (1) The Central Collection Unit may not compromise and settle a judgment
of restitution unless:
(i) the Division or the Department of Juvenile Services obtains the
consent of the victim; or
(ii) the court orders otherwise because a victim cannot be located.
(2) The Division or the Department of Juvenile Services shall contact the
victim to determine whether the victim consents to compromise and settle a judgment of
restitution.
(d) If complete restitution and interest have been paid or a judgment of restitution
has been compromised and settled as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the Division,
the Department of Juvenile Services, or the Central Collection Unit immediately shall
notify:
(1) the court that issued the judgment by filing the statement as provided
under § 11–608(c) of this subtitle that the judgment has been satisfied; and
(2) the last known employer of a restitution obligor to terminate an
earnings withholding order issued under § 11–617 of this subtitle.
(e) (1) Restitution is overdue if the restitution or a restitution payment is not
paid:
(i) by the date that the court orders; or
(ii) if no date is ordered, by the later of:
1. the date the Division or the Department of Juvenile
Services directs the restitution obligor to pay restitution or make a restitution payment; or
2. 30 days after the court enters a judgment of restitution.
(2) (I) If restitution is overdue, the amount of the arrearage is the
amount of restitution ordered and any interest allowed by law, minus any amount
previously paid or received under the judgment of restitution.
(II) INTEREST ACCRUED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH FOR RESTITUTION ORDERED UNDER § 7–106.1 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED AS FOLLOWS:
1. 50% TO THE PERSON TO WHOM THE MAIL OR
PACKAGE WAS ADDRESSED; AND

HOUSE BILL 792
2. 50% TO THE COURT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.